Florida, session 2026, SB796.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 57 58 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âVeterinary 59 Workforce Innovation Act.â 60 Section 2.âSection 474.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to 61 read: 62 474.201âLegislative findings, intent, and purpose.â 63 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the practice of veterinary 64 medicine is potentially dangerous to the public health and 65 safety if conducted by incompetent and unlicensed practitioners. 66 The legislative purpose in enacting this chapter is to ensure 67 that every veterinarian practicing in this state meet minimum 68 requirements for safe practice. It is the legislative intent 69 that veterinarians who are not normally competent or who 70 otherwise present a danger to the public must shall be 71 disciplined or prohibited from practicing in this state. 72 (2)âThe Legislature finds that the practice of educated, 73 trained, and experienced veterinary professional associates, 74 veterinary technicians, and veterinary technologists will 75 increase consumer access to high-quality veterinary medical 76 services at a reasonable cost to consumers, while also 77 increasing the efficiency of the practice of veterinary medicine 78 in this state. 79 Section 3.âPresent subsection (14) of section 474.202, 80 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (17), and a new 81 subsection (14) and subsections (15) and (16) are added to that 82 section, to read: 83 474.202âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 84 (14)ââVeterinary professional associateâ means an 85 individual who has graduated with a masterâs degree or the 86 equivalent in veterinary clinical care from an accredited 87 institution and who meets the requirements to be registered by 88 the department. 89 (15)ââVeterinary technicianâ or âveterinary technologistâ 90 means an individual who has graduated from an accredited 91 veterinary technology program and who meets the requirements to 92 be registered by the department. The term also includes a 93 veterinary nurse. 94 (16)ââVeterinary technologyâ includes, with respect to 95 animals, the provision of medical care, monitoring, and 96 treatment of a veterinary patient by a person who is a 97 registered veterinary technician or technologist working under 98 supervision of a licensed veterinarian as authorized under this 99 chapter. The term includes veterinary nursing. 100 Section 4.âSubsection (4) of section 474.2021, Florida 101 Statutes, is amended to read: 102 474.2021âVeterinary telehealth.â 103 (4)âA veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth: 104 (a)âMay not engage in the practice of veterinary telehealth 105 unless it is within the context of a veterinarian/client/patient 106 relationship; 107 (b)âShall practice in a manner consistent with his or her 108 scope of practice and the prevailing professional standard of 109 practice for a veterinarian who provides in-person veterinary 110 services to patients in this state and shall employ sound, 111 professional judgment to determine whether using veterinary 112 telehealth is an appropriate method for delivering medical 113 advice or treatment to the patient; 114 (c)âMay use veterinary telehealth to perform an initial 115 patient evaluation to establish the veterinarian/client/patient 116 relationship if the evaluation is conducted using synchronous, 117 audiovisual communication. The evaluation may not be performed 118 using audio-only communications, text messaging, questionnaires, 119 chatbots, or other similar means. If a veterinarian practicing 120 telehealth conducts a patient evaluation sufficient to diagnose 121 and treat the patient, the veterinarian is not required to 122 research a patientâs medical history or conduct a physical 123 examination of the patient before using veterinary telehealth to 124 provide a veterinary health care service to the patient; 125 (d)âIf the initial patient evaluation is performed using 126 veterinary telehealth, must provide the client with a statement 127 containing the veterinarianâs name, license number, and contact 128 information and the contact information for at least one 129 physical veterinary clinic in the vicinity of the patientâs 130 location and instructions for how to receive patient follow-up 131 care or assistance if the veterinarian and client are unable to 132 communicate because of a technological or equipment failure or 133 if there is an adverse reaction to treatment, and inform the 134 client that, if medication is prescribed, the client may obtain 135 a prescription that may be filled at the pharmacy of his or her 136 choice. The veterinarian shall obtain from the client a signed 137 and dated statement indicating the client has received the 138 required information before practicing veterinary telehealth; 139 (e)âShall prescribe all drugs and medications in accordance 140 with all federal and state laws and the following requirements: 141 1.âA veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may 142 order, prescribe, or make available medicinal drugs or drugs 143 specifically approved for use in animals by the United States 144 Food and Drug Administration, the use of which conforms to the 145 approved labeling. Prescriptions based solely on a telehealth 146 evaluation may be issued for up to 6 months 1 month for products 147 labeled solely for flea and tick control and up to 30 14 days of 148 treatment for other animal drugs. Prescriptions based solely on 149 a telehealth evaluation may not be renewed without an in-person 150 examination. 151 2.âA veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may not 152 order, prescribe, or make available medicinal drugs or drugs as 153 defined in s. 465.003 approved by the United States Food and 154 Drug Administration for human use or compounded antibacterial, 155 antifungal, antiviral, or antiparasitic medications, unless the 156 veterinarian has conducted an in-person physical examination of 157 the animal or made medically appropriate and timely visits to 158 the premises where the animal is kept. 159 3.âA veterinarian may not use veterinary telehealth to 160 prescribe a controlled substance as defined in chapter 893 161 unless the veterinarian has conducted an in-person physical 162 examination of the animal or made medically appropriate and 163 timely visits within the past year to the premises where the 164 animal is kept. 165 4.âA veterinarian practicing veterinary telehealth may not 166 prescribe a drug or other medication for use on a horse engaged 167 in racing or training at a facility under the jurisdiction of 168 the Florida Gaming Control Commission or on a horse that is a 169 covered horse as defined in the federal Horseracing Integrity 170 and Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 3051 et seq.; 171 (f)âShall be familiar with available veterinary resources, 172 including emergency resources, near the patientâs location and 173 be able to provide the client with a list of nearby 174 veterinarians who may be able to see the patient in person upon 175 the request of the client; 176 (g)âShall keep, maintain, and make available a summary of 177 the patient record as provided in s. 474.2165; and 178 (h)âMay not use veterinary telehealth to issue an 179 international or interstate travel certificate or a certificate 180 of veterinary inspection. 181 Section 5.âSubsection (3), paragraph (a) of subsection (5), 182 and subsection (7) of section 474.203, Florida Statutes, are 183 amended to read: 184 474.203âExemptions.âThis chapter does not apply to: 185 (3)âA student in a school or college of veterinary medicine 186 or a program for veterinary technology while in the performance 187 of duties assigned by her or his instructor or when working as a 188 preceptor under the immediate supervision of a licensee, if such 189 preceptorship is required for graduation from an accredited 190 school or college of veterinary medicine or program for 191 veterinary technology. The licensed veterinarian is responsible 192 for all acts performed by a preceptor under her or his 193 supervision. 194 (5)(a)âAny person, or the personâs regular employee, 195 administering to the ills or injuries of her or his own animals, 196 including, but not limited to, castration, spaying, and 197 dehorning of herd animals, unless title is transferred or 198 employment provided for the purpose of circumventing this law. 199 This exemption does not apply to any person licensed as a 200 veterinarian or registered as a veterinary professional 201 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist in 202 another state or foreign jurisdiction and practicing temporarily 203 in this state. However, except as provided in s. 474.2126 or s. 204 828.30, only a veterinarian may immunize or treat an animal for 205 diseases that are communicable to humans and that are of public 206 health significance. 207 (7)âAny veterinary aide, nurse, laboratory technician, 208 preceptor, or assistant; any registered veterinary professional 209 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist, 210 registered pursuant to s. 474.2126; or other employee of a 211 licensed veterinarian who administers medication or who renders 212 auxiliary or supporting assistance under the responsible 213 supervision of a licensed veterinarian, including those tasks 214 identified by rule of the board requiring immediate supervision, 215 provided that a registered veterinary professional associate, 216 veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist is subject to 217 s. 474.2126. However, the licensed veterinarian is responsible 218 for all such acts performed under this subsection by persons 219 under her or his supervision. 220 221 For the purposes of chapters 465 and 893, persons exempt 222 pursuant to subsection (1), subsection (2), or subsection (4) 223 are deemed to be duly licensed practitioners authorized by the 224 laws of this state to prescribe drugs or medicinal supplies. 225 Section 6.âSection 474.204, Florida Statutes, is amended to 226 read: 227 474.204âBoard of Veterinary Medicine.â 228 (1)âTo carry out the provisions of this chapter, there is 229 created within the department the Board of Veterinary Medicine 230 composed consisting of all of the following seven members, who 231 shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by 232 the Senate:. 233 (a)(2)âFive members of the board who are shall be licensed 234 veterinarians. 235 (b)âTwo members who are registered with the department as a 236 veterinary professional associate, veterinary technician, or 237 veterinary technologist and who have been employed as such for 238 at least 5 years immediately preceding the date of appointment 239 to the board. 240 (c)âTwo members of the board who are shall be laypersons 241 who are not and have never been veterinarians or members of any 242 closely related profession or occupation. 243 (2)(3)âAll provisions of chapter 455 relating to activities 244 of regulatory boards shall apply. 245 Section 7.âSection 474.2126, Florida Statutes, is created 246 to read: 247 474.2126âVeterinary professional associates, veterinary 248 technicians, and veterinary technologists; registration.â 249 (1)âREGISTRATION.â 250 (a)âA veterinary professional associate, veterinary 251 technician, or veterinary technologist may apply to the 252 department for registration by submitting a form prescribed by 253 the board. The department shall consider for registration each 254 qualified veterinary professional associate, veterinary 255 technician, or veterinary technologist, or applicant who the 256 department verifies has submitted a completed application and 257 meets the applicable requirements of this subsection. 258 (b)âThe department shall issue a certificate of 259 registration to each veterinary professional associate, 260 veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist applicant who 261 the department verifies has graduated from the relevant 262 accredited program and received a passing score on the relevant 263 professional national competency examination approved by the 264 board. 265 (c)âThe department shall issue a certificate of 266 registration to an veterinary technician who does not meet the 267 requirements of paragraph (b), if he or she: 268 1.âSubmits a notarized document from an employer who is a 269 licensed veterinarian certifying that as of January 1, 2000, the 270 applicant possesses 5 or more years of practical experience 271 performing the tasks of a veterinary technician in this state; 272 2.âProvides proof of graduation from a veterinary 273 technology program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical 274 Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and 275 Activities before January 1, 2000; and 276 3.âIs in good standing with the appropriate Florida 277 certifying body, including the Florida Veterinary Technician 278 Association or the Florida Veterinary Medical Association, is 279 eligible to apply for registration. 280 (d)âThe department shall make the list of registrants 281 available to the public on its website. 282 (e)âThe department may suspend the registration of any 283 veterinary professional associate, veterinary technician, or 284 veterinary technologist who the board determines has caused 285 serious harm to an animal due to negligence, incompetence, or 286 misconduct related to duties performed under this section and in 287 a manner inconsistent with the supervising veterinarianâs 288 specific direction, until which time as the registrant has 289 completed remedial training or education directed by the board. 290 (f)âThe department may rescind the registration of any 291 veterinary professional associate, veterinary technician, or 292 veterinary technologist who is convicted of animal cruelty or 293 animal fighting under s. 828.12 or s. 828.122. 294 (2)âPROHIBITION.âAn individual may not hold himself or 295 herself out as a registered veterinary professional associate, 296 veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist or use the 297 abbreviation RVT, RVTg, VT, VPA, or MVCC or in any other way 298 represent himself or herself as a veterinary professional 299 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist 300 unless he or she has a valid certificate of registration from 301 the department. 302 (3)âDUTIES AND ACTIONS OF A REGISTERED VETERINARY 303 TECHNICIAN OR VETERINARY TECHNOLOGIST.â 304 (a)âUnless otherwise prohibited by this section or other 305 state or federal law, a registered veterinary technician or 306 veterinary technologist may perform duties or actions in which 307 he or she is competent and has the necessary training, current 308 knowledge, and experience to provide, as delegated under the 309 responsible supervision, as defined in s. 474.202, of a licensed 310 veterinarian or registered veterinary professional associate. In 311 addition to other duties or actions approved by the supervising 312 veterinarian, a registered veterinary technician or veterinary 313 technologist may perform all the following actions under the 314 responsible supervision, as defined in s. 474.202, of a licensed 315 veterinarian or a veterinary professional associate as delegated 316 by a licensed veterinarian: 317 1.âAdminister medical drugs as defined in chapter 465 318 prescribed for a patient by the supervising veterinarian, or 319 provide treatments, as directed; 320 2.âPrepare, record, and administer vaccinations and 321 microchips; or 322 3.âPerform humane euthanasia of animals and prepare, log, 323 and administer controlled substances for the purpose of 324 analgesia, anesthesia, or humane euthanasia, as delegated by a 325 licensed veterinarian and performed under responsible 326 supervision. 327 (b)âExcept as otherwise authorized by this section or other 328 state law, a registered veterinary technician or veterinary 329 technologist may not perform any of the following actions: 330 1.âMake or provide any diagnosis or prognosis; 331 2.âPerform any surgery, except that a registered veterinary 332 technician or registered veterinary technologist may perform 333 suturing or stapling of skin lacerations, gingival incisions, or 334 existing surgical incisions or tooth extraction procedures; or 335 3.âPrescribe any medical drugs as defined in chapter 465 or 336 controlled substances as defined in chapter 893. 337 (4)âDUTIES AND ACTIONS OF A REGISTERED VETERINARY 338 PROFESSIONAL ASSOCIATE.â 339 (a)âUnless otherwise prohibited by this section or other 340 state or federal law, a registered veterinary professional 341 associate may engage in the practice of veterinary medicine as 342 defined in s. 474.202 or veterinary medicine as defined in s. 343 474.202, to the extent that he or she is competent and has the 344 necessary training, current knowledge, and experience to provide 345 such care, as delegated under the responsible supervision, as 346 defined in s. 474.202, of a licensed veterinarian. 347 (b)âA registered veterinary professional associate may not 348 do any of the following: 349 1.âPrescribe a controlled substance listed in s. 893.03, 350 except that a registered veterinary professional associate may 351 perform humane euthanasia and prepare, log, and administer 352 controlled substances for the purpose of analgesia, anesthesia, 353 or humane euthanasia, as delegated by a licensed veterinarian 354 and performed under responsible supervision. 355 2.âPerform a surgical procedure, except that a veterinary 356 professional associate may perform the following surgical 357 procedures: 358 a.âOrchiectomy; 359 b.âVeterinary dental surgery; or 360 c.âVeterinary suturing or stapling of skin lacerations, 361 gingival incisions, or existing surgical incisions. 362 (5)âADMINISTRATION OF MEDICATION.âAn individual who is not 363 registered with the state as a veterinary professional 364 associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist may 365 administer medication prescribed by the supervising veterinarian 366 for a patient or render auxiliary or supporting assistance only 367 under the immediate supervision, as defined in s. 474.202, of a 368 licensed veterinarian or under the immediate supervision of a 369 registered veterinary professional associate, veterinary 370 technician, or veterinary technologist who is acting under the 371 responsible supervision of a licensed veterinarian or his or her 372 delegee as defined in s. 474.202, as provided for in subsection 373 (6). This section does not prohibit an individual from rendering 374 lifesaving aid and treatment to an animal in the absence of a 375 veterinarian if the animal is in a life-threatening condition 376 and requires immediate treatment to sustain life or prevent 377 further injury. 378 (6)âDELEGATION.âUnless otherwise prohibited under this 379 section or other state law or federal law, a supervising 380 licensed veterinarian may in his or her judgment delegate to a 381 registered veterinary professional associate, veterinary 382 technician, or veterinary technologist the responsibility of 383 supervising a task or tasks performed by a veterinary assistant. 384 (7)âLIABILITY.âA supervising licensed veterinarian is 385 liable for any acts or omissions of the registered veterinary 386 professional associate, veterinary technician, or veterinary 387 technologist acting under the licensed veterinarianâs 388 supervision and control. 389 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection 390 (3) of section 828.30, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 391 828.30âRabies vaccination of dogs, cats, and ferrets.â 392 (1)(a)âAll dogs, cats, and ferrets 4 months of age or older 393 must be vaccinated by a licensed veterinarian or a person 394 authorized under paragraph (b) or s. 474.2126 against rabies 395 with a vaccine that is licensed by the United States Department 396 of Agriculture for use in those species. 397 (3)âUpon vaccination against rabies, the licensed 398 veterinarian shall provide the animalâs owner and the animal 399 control authority with a rabies vaccination certificate. Each 400 animal control authority and veterinarian shall use the âRabies 401 Vaccination Certificateâ of the National Association of State 402 Public Health Veterinarians (NASPHV) or an equivalent form 403 approved by the local government that contains all the 404 information required by the NASPHV Rabies Vaccination 405 Certificate. The veterinarian who administers the rabies 406 vaccination or who supervises the administration of the rabies 407 vaccination as provided in paragraph (1)(b) or s. 474.2126 to an 408 animal as authorized under this section may affix his or her 409 signature stamp in lieu of an actual signature. 410 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.